Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2602.04
Bonds; limitation on pledge of revenue.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for bonds issued on or after July 1, 2008, funds received by the issuer pursuant to section 77-2602 shall not be pledged for repayment of bonds, except that such funds may be pledged for repayment of refunding bonds issued to refund bonds issued prior to May 20, 2009.

Laws 2008, LB961, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 21.